Connecticut, session 2026, HB05155.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a working
group within the legislative branch to examine the creation of a
searchable database that is capable of receiving, organizing and storing
data associated with the sales and use of pesticides that the
Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection may require or
request pursuant to chapter 441 of the general statutes. In undertaking
such examination, such working group shall review the searchable
pesticide databases of not less than two other states, including, but not
limited to: (1) Reviewing the costs of creating, licensing and maintaining
such databases and the costs associated with complying with the use of
such databases for any applicator, farmer, retailer or other person who
reports any such sales or use information, and (2) learning the
parameters, uses, outcomes and end users of such databases, including,
but not limited to, any security or proprietary information issues related
to the use of such databases.
(b) Not later than thirty days after the effective date of this section,
the cochairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to the environment shall jointly select two cochairpersons of

House Bill No. 5155
such working group who shall, not later than thirty days after such
appointment, select the membership of such working group, which
shall include: (1) A representative of the Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection, (2) a representative of the Department of
Agriculture, (3) a representative of a national trade association that
represents manufacturers, retailers or formulators of consumer,
industrial and institutional products used for pest control management,
(4) the director of the Sea Grant Program at The University of
Connecticut, or the director's designee, (5) a representative of licensed
commercial pesticide applicators, (6) a representative of the Connecticut
Farm Bureau, (7) a representative of an advocacy group that represents
invertebrate conservation, (8) a representative of a watershed group that
advocates for pesticide reform, (9) a representative of an organization
that advocates for bird conservation, (10) a representative of the nursery
association, (11) a representative of organic farmers, and (12) a
representative of the Connecticut association of golf course
superintendents.
(c) The cochairpersons of such working group shall convene the
working group not later than thirty days after the appointment of such
membership pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
(d) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the
environment shall serve as administrative staff to the working group.
(e) Not later than January 15, 2027, such working group shall submit
a report on its examination, findings and recommendations, including,
but not limited to, any legislative proposals, to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to the environment, in accordance with the provisions of section
11-4a of the general statutes. Such working group shall terminate on the
date that it submits such report or January 15, 2027, whichever is later.
Special Act No. 26-10 2 of 3

House Bill No. 5155
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Special Act No. 26-10 3 of 3